Maryland, session 2025, SB0353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Food Deserts Workgroup.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Secretary of Aging, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Agriculture, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(7) the Secretary of Housing and Community Development, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(8) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0353*

SENATE BILL 353
(9) the Secretary of Planning, or the Secretary’s designee;
(10) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the State Superintendent’s
designee;
(11) one member of the Maryland Food System Resiliency Council,
designated by the Secretary of Emergency Management;
(12) one representative of the Maryland Municipal League, designated by
the Chief Executive Officer of the Maryland Municipal League; and
(13) the following representatives of the Maryland Association of Counties,
designated by the Executive Director of the Maryland Association of Counties:
(i) one representative from a rural county;
(ii) one representative from a suburban county; and
(iii) one representative from Baltimore City.
(c) The members of the Workgroup shall elect the chair of the Workgroup.
(d) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall provide staff
for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) conduct an analysis of food deserts in the State that includes:
(i) a discussion of the overall concept of food deserts and the location
of food deserts in the State;
(ii) an examination of the health impacts of food deserts on the local
population, including any related environmental concerns, and the impacts of food deserts
on the economy;
(iii) an assessment of strategies to attract grocery stores and
supermarket retailers to identified food deserts and any associated costs, including a review

SENATE BILL 353 3
of existing incentives and available financing programs in this State and in other states;
and
(iv) any other topic, as determined by the Workgroup, related to food
deserts; and
(2) prepare a report that includes:
(i) key findings from the Workgroup’s analysis conducted under
paragraph (1) of this subsection; and
(ii) recommendations regarding solutions to eliminate food deserts
in the State.
(g) On or before November 1, 2025, the Workgroup shall submit the report of its
findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the General Assembly, the Senate Committee on Education,
Energy, and the Environment, the Senate Finance Committee, the House Economic
Matters Committee, and the House Environment and Transportation Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.